Utah statutes.
78B-15-305.   Effect of declaration or denial of paternity.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 78B-15-306 and 78B-15-307, a valid declaration of paternity filed with the Office of Vital Records is equivalent to a legal finding of paternity of a child and confers upon the declarant father all of the rights and duties of a parent.

(2)  When a declaration of paternity is filed, it shall be recognized as a basis for a child support order without any further requirement or proceeding regarding the establishment of paternity.

(a)  The liabilities of the father include, but are not limited to, the reasonable expense of the mother's pregnancy and confinement and for the education, necessary support, and any funeral expenses for the child.

(b)  When a father declares paternity, his liability for past amounts due is limited to the period of four years immediately preceding the date that the voluntary declaration of paternity was filed.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 78B-15-306 and 78B-15-307, a valid denial of paternity by a presumed or declarant father filed with the Office of Vital Records in conjunction with a valid declaration of paternity is equivalent to a legal finding of the nonpaternity of the presumed or declarant father and discharges the presumed or declarant father from all rights and duties of a parent.  If a valid denial of paternity is filed with the Office of Vital Records, the declarant or presumed father may not recover child support he paid prior to the time of filing.

